Maine, session 132, LD1022.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §18-A, sub-§3-A, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. Beginning no later than July 1, 2026, an annual appropriation in an amount no less
than $9,500,000 must be deposited in the fund in each fiscal year and distributed as
part of the quarterly distributions made in accordance with subsection 6.
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §18-A, sub-§3-A, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. No later than April 1, 2026, and biennially thereafter, the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters shall hold a public hearing
on the annual report of the Civil Legal Services Fund Commission submitted in
accordance with subsection 6, and on any additional information that organizations
receiving distributions from the fund or other members of the public may provide
concerning the extent to which the need for civil legal representation of persons with
low incomes remains unmet, including without limitation the number of civil legal aid
attorneys available in the State for each 10,000 persons with incomes below 200% of
the federal poverty level and the extent to which that number is less than 10 attorneys
Page 1 - 132LR0965(01)

412 per 10,000 persons with low income. No later than June 1, 2026, and biennially
423 thereafter, the committee shall make a recommendation to the Governor and to the joint
434 standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and
445 financial affairs on the extent to which the appropriation required by paragraph D must
456 be increased in the fiscal year following the appropriation and in subsequent fiscal
467 years to sustain and improve access to justice in civil legal matters. The
478 recommendation must be based on consideration of the annual report of the
489 commission submitted in accordance with subsection 6 and other information received
590 at the public hearing required by this paragraph. The joint standing committee of the
1501 Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters may report out legislation on
1512 matters related to the annual reports of the commission submitted in accordance with
1523 subsection 6 and the committee's recommendation under this paragraph.
Sec. 3. 4 MRSA §18-A, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 173, §7, is amended to
read:
6. Distribution of funds. The Supreme Judicial Court shall appoint the Civil Legal
Services Fund Commission, consisting of 3 persons knowledgeable about the problems of
ensuring access to justice in this State, to determine how to distribute the funds in
accordance with subsection 1 in a manner that will most efficiently and effectively maintain
and enhance access to justice in this State. The commission shall review the allocation at
least every 4 years or on the request of any member of the commission and shall make
adjustments to the allocation when appropriate. Funds must be distributed at least quarterly
with the first distribution occurring no later than January 2, 1998. The commission shall
compile information on the types of cases handled by recipient organizations and shall
report this information and its allocation decisions annually to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters no later than February 1, 1999
1st.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Maine Civil Legal Services Fund Z367
Initiative: Increases funding for civil legal services for persons with income below 200%
of the federal poverty level by providing additional funds for distribution by determination
of the Civil Legal Services Fund Commission pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
4, section 18-A, subsection 6.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,400,000 $9,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,400,000 $9,500,000
3395 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
4306 takes effect when approved.